Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CATHOLIC CHARITIES HOMELESS ELDERS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Catholic Charities of St. Paul and Minneapolis to operate its homeless elders program that helps homeless, isolated, and low-income older adults to move into stable housing. new text end